California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(3) An agency, shelter, or group may require proof that the cat is microchipped pursuant to paragraph (1) before releasing, adopting out, selling, or giving away the cat. If a cat has a preexisting microchip or there is reasonable proof of ownership, the agency, shelter, or group shall
 document and retain a record of all efforts made to contact the microchip’s primary registrant or other demonstrated owner for at least two years.

(4) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), an owner reclaiming a cat or new owner receiving a cat is not required to register the cat’s microchip number with a microchip registry company that will use, without the owner’s or new owner’s consent, the personal information of the owner or new owner for purposes other than to reunite the owner or new owner with the cat.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not require a cat to be microchipped if a licensed veterinarian certifies in writing that the cat is medically unfit for the microchipping procedure because the cat has a physical
 condition that would be substantially aggravated by the procedure.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not require a cat to be microchipped if the agency, shelter, or group receives a signed form from the owner reclaiming the cat or new owner receiving the cat that states that the cost of microchipping would impose an economic hardship for the owner or new owner.

(c) (1) An agency, shelter, or group that violates this section on or after January 1, 2022, is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31401) of Division 14 and Section 9 do not apply to a violation of this section.

(3) An agency, shelter, or group that does not have microchipping capability on location is not subject to the civil penalty described in this subdivision upon obtaining the agreement described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) This section does not apply to a cat that is temporarily housed under an emergency evacuation order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   (AB 2723)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31752.2.

(a) Upon relinquishment of a cat to a public or private shelter, the owner of that cat shall present sufficient identification to establish his or her ownership of the cat and shall sign a statement that he or she is the lawful owner of the cat.

(b) Any person who provides false information pursuant to this subdivision about his or her ownership of the cat shall be liable to the true owner of the cat in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 567, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

31752.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Domestic cats’ temperaments range from completely docile indoor pets to completely unsocialized outdoor cats that avoid all contact with humans.

(2) “Feral cats” are cats with temperaments that are completely unsocialized, although frightened or injured tame pet cats may appear to be feral.

(3) Some people care for or own feral cats.

(4) Feral cats pose particular safety hazards for animal
 shelter employees.

(5) It is cruel to keep feral cats caged for long periods of time; however, it is not always easy to distinguish a feral cat from a frightened tame cat.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “feral cat” is defined as a cat without owner identification of any kind whose usual and consistent temperament is extreme fear and resistance to contact with people. A feral cat is totally unsocialized to people.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 31752, if an apparently feral cat has not been reclaimed by its owner or caretaker within the first three days of the required holding period, animal shelter personnel qualified to verify the temperament of the animal shall verify whether it is feral or tame by using a standardized protocol. If the cat is determined to be docile or a frightened or difficult
 tame cat, the cat shall be held for the entire required holding period specified in Section 31752. If the cat is determined to be truly feral, the cat may be euthanized or relinquished to a nonprofit, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, animal adoption organization that agrees to the spaying or neutering of the cat if it has not already been spayed or neutered. In addition to any required spay or neuter deposit, the animal shelter, at its discretion, may assess a fee, not to exceed the standard adoption fee, for the animal released.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 9.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

31753.

A rabbit, guinea pig, hamster, potbellied pig, bird, lizard, snake, turtle, or tortoise that is legally allowed as personal property and that is impounded in a public or private shelter shall be held for the same period of time, under the same requirements of care, and with the same opportunities for redemption and adoption by new owners or nonprofit, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, animal rescue, or adoption organizations as provided for cats and dogs. The public or private shelter may enter into cooperative agreements with animal rescue or adoption organizations regarding rabbits that are equivalent to those cooperative agreements authorized in Section 31108 regarding dogs and Section 31752 regarding cats. Section 17006 shall also apply to these animals. In addition to a required spay or neuter deposit, the public or
 private shelter, at its discretion, may assess a fee, not to exceed the standard adoption fee, for animals adopted by new owners or released to nonprofit animal rescue or adoption organizations pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 96, Sec. 3.   (AB 1988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31754.

(a) Except as provided in Section 17006, an animal relinquished by the purported owner that is of a species impounded by public or private shelters shall be held for the same holding periods, with the same requirements of care, applicable to stray dogs and cats in Sections 31108 and 31752, and shall be available for owner redemption or adoption for the entire holding period.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), kittens or puppies relinquished by the purported owner, or brought in by any other person with authority to relinquish them, to public or private shelters, may be available immediately for adoption, or made immediately available for release to a nonprofit, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 animal rescue, or adoption organization if requested by the organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 96, Sec. 4.   (AB 1988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Special Provisions Applicable to Counties With a Population of Less Than 100,000 Persons [31760. - 31765.]

31760.

(a) This chapter only applies to a county that has a population of less than 100,000 persons as of January 1, 2000, and to cities within that county. A county whose population exceeds 100,000 persons in a year subsequent to January 1, 2000, shall be subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31751) commencing on January 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the population of that county exceeds 100,000 persons.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall sell or give away any cat that has not been spayed or neutered.

(c) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may not transfer to a new owner a cat that has not been spayed or neutered, except as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may transfer to a new owner a cat that has not been spayed or neutered only if the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group does both of the following:

(1) Requires a written agreement, executed by the recipient, acknowledging the cat is not spayed or neutered and the recipient agrees in writing to be responsible for ensuring the cat will be spayed or neutered within 30 business days after the agreement is signed.

(2) Receives from the recipient a sterilization deposit of not less than forty dollars ($40) and not more than seventy-five dollars ($75), the terms of which are part of the written agreement executed by the recipient under this section.

(e) Public animal control agencies or shelters, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelters, humane society shelters, and rescue groups may enter into cooperative agreements with each other and with veterinarians in lieu of requiring spaying and neutering deposits to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

31761.

(a) A spaying or neutering deposit may be either of the following:

(1) A portion of the adoption fee or other fees rendered in acquiring the cat, which will enable the adopter to take the cat for spaying or neutering to a veterinarian with whom the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group has an agreement that provides that the veterinarian will bill the shelter directly for the sterilization.

(2) A deposit that is both of the following:

(A) Refundable to the recipient if proof of spaying or neutering of the cat is presented to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group not more than 30 business days after the date the cat is spayed or neutered.

(B) Forfeited to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group if proof of spaying or neutering is not presented to the animal shelter within 30 business days.

(b) Deposits shall be in the amount determined by the shelter, but shall not be less than forty dollars ($40) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(c) All spaying or neutering deposits forfeited or unclaimed under this section shall be retained by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group and shall be used by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group only for the following purposes:

(1) A program to spay or neuter dogs and cats.

(2) A public education program to reduce and prevent overpopulation of dogs and cats, and the related costs to local government.

(3) A followup program to ensure that dogs and cats transferred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group are spayed or neutered in accordance with the agreement executed under subdivision (d) of Section 31760.

(4) Any additional costs incurred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in the administration of the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

31762.

(a) (1) If a recipient fails to comply with the spaying or neutering agreement within 30 business days after the agreement is signed, the recipient shall forfeit the sterilization deposit and is subject to a fine pursuant to Section 31763.

(2) An animal control officer, humane officer, police officer, peace officer, or any agency authorized to enforce the Penal Code may write citations with a civil penalty stated in an amount corresponding to the violation as provided in Section 31763. The fines shall be paid to the local municipality or public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group. Any funds collected under this section shall be expended for the purpose of humane education, programs for low cost spaying and neutering of cats and any additional costs incurred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in the administration of the requirements of this chapter. This subdivision is applicable within any county.

(3) If the owner, at any time subsequent to 30 business days after the spaying or neutering agreement was signed, provides proof of spaying or neutering, the deposit shall be forfeited, but any fine levied but not yet paid, shall be waived.

(b) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may extend the date by which spaying or neutering is to be completed at its discretion for good cause shown. Any extension shall be in writing.

(c) If a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state certifies that a cat is too sick or injured to be spayed or neutered, or that it would otherwise be detrimental to the health of the cat to be spayed or neutered, the adopter or purchaser shall pay the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group a deposit of not less than forty dollars ($40), and not more than seventy-five dollars ($75). The entity shall establish the amount of the deposit at the level it determines is necessary to encourage the spaying or neutering of cats. The deposit shall be temporary, and shall be retained only until the cat is healthy enough to be spayed or neutered as certified by a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state. The cat shall be spayed or neutered within 14 business days of that certification. The adopter or purchaser shall obtain written proof of spaying or neutering from the veterinarian performing the operation. If the adopter or purchaser presents proof of spaying or neutering to the entity from which the cat was obtained within 30 business days, the adopter or purchaser shall receive a full refund of the deposit.

(d) If an adopted cat dies within the spaying or neutering period provided for in the written agreement pursuant to Section 31760, subdivision (c) shall not apply to the cat. In that case, the recipient may receive a reimbursement of the sterilization deposit by submitting to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group within the sterilization period a signed letter from a veterinarian licensed to practice medicine in this state stating that the animal has died. The letter shall include a description of the cat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

31763.

(a) (1) A person who commits any violation of subdivision (b) is subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50) on a first violation of subdivision (b), and a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) on any second or subsequent violation of subdivision (b).

(2) An action for a penalty proposed under this section may be commenced by the administrator of the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group from which the recipient obtained the animal that is the subject of the violation in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) A person is subject to the civil penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) if that person does any of the following:

(1) Falsifies any proof of spaying or neutering submitted for the purpose of compliance with this chapter.

(2) Provides to a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group or a licensed veterinarian inaccurate information regarding ownership of any cat required to be submitted for spaying or neutering under this chapter.

(3) Submits to a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group false information regarding sterilization fees or fee schedules.

(4) Issues a check for insufficient funds for any spaying or neutering deposit required under this chapter.

(c) All penalties collected under this section shall be retained by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group imposing the penalties, to be used solely for purposes provided for under subdivision (c) of Section 31761.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

31764.

Local ordinances concerning the adoption or placement procedures of any animal shelter shall be at least as restrictive as this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

31764.5.

(a) A public animal shelter shall not charge an adoption fee for a cat if the person adopting the cat presents to the public animal shelter a current and valid driver’s license or identification card with the word “VETERAN” printed on its face pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) A public animal
 shelter may limit the number of cats adopted from that public animal shelter pursuant to this section to one cat each six-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 205, Sec. 5.   (SB 245)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

31765.

Whenever a county, or a city that is within a county to which this chapter applies, requires cat license tags, the tag shall be issued for one-half or less of the fee required for a cat, if a certificate is presented from a licensed veterinarian that the cat has been spayed or neutered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.8. ANIMALS [32000. - 32102.]



PART 1. Animal Facilities and Shelters [32000. - 32003.]

32000.

The selling or giving away of any animal to any facility subject to the provision of Public Law 89, Chapter 544, of the 89th Congress, Second Session (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 et seq.) shall be conditioned upon compliance by the facility with the provisions of that law, and that selling or giving away shall be exempt from Sections 30503 and 31751.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1290, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

32001.

(a) All public animal shelters shelters operated by societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and humane shelters, that contract to perform public animal control services, shall provide the owners of lost animals and those who find lost animals with all of the following:

(1) Ability to list the animals they have lost or found on “Lost and Found” lists maintained by the
 animal shelter.

(2) Referrals to animals listed that may be the animals the owners or finders have lost or found.

(3) The telephone numbers and addresses of other
 animal
 shelters in the same vicinity.

(4) Advice as to means of publishing and disseminating information regarding lost animals.

(5) The telephone numbers and addresses of volunteer groups that may be of assistance in locating lost animals.

(b) The duties imposed by this section are mandatory duties for public entities for all purposes of the Government Code and for all private entities with which a public entity has contracted to perform those duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 10.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

32003.

All public and private animal shelters shall keep accurate records on each animal taken up, medically treated, or impounded. The records shall include all of the following information and any other information required by the California Veterinary Medical Board:

(a) The date the animal was taken up, medically treated, euthanized, or impounded.

(b) The circumstances under which the animal was taken up, medically treated, euthanized, or impounded.

(c) The names of the personnel who took up, medically treated, euthanized, or impounded the animal.

(d) A description of any medical treatment provided to the animal and the name of the veterinarian of record.

(e) The final disposition of the animal, including the name of the person who euthanized the animal or the name and address of the adopting party. These records shall be maintained for three years after the date on which the animal’s impoundment ends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 11.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. California Veterinary Emergency Team Program [32100. - 32102.]

32100.

This part shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make any of these provisions applicable to the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 72.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

32101.

(a) The University of California, Davis, School of Veterinary Medicine shall develop a program called the California Veterinary Emergency Team. The program shall assist in the support and training of a network of government agencies, nongovernmental organizations, and individuals to assist in the evacuation and care of household and domestic animals and livestock in emergencies statewide, including disaster preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation. The program shall also conduct or support research on best practices for the evacuation and care of the animals in disasters.

(b) The program shall ensure that the training and the care provided by or coordinated by the program are at levels that are consistent with those standards
 generally accepted within the veterinary profession. The program shall deploy responders to oversee the network volunteers and ensure accepted practices are implemented in the field during emergencies.

(c) The University of California, Davis, School of Veterinary Medicine, the secretary, and the Director of Emergency Services shall develop a memorandum of understanding for the university to consult with the secretary and the director regarding the coordination of the program’s activities with the state government’s disaster response practices and the deployment of the program’s participants during disasters. The memorandum of understanding shall outline program metrics.

(d) The program shall provide a progress report every three years on the activities outlined in the memorandum of understanding to the secretary and the Director of Emergency Services.

(e) For purposes of this part, “program” means the California Veterinary Emergency Team.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 72.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

32102.

Funds made available for purposes of this part shall not be considered an offset to any other state funds appropriated to the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 72.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. MILK AND MILK PRODUCTS ACT OF 1947 [32501. - 39912.]



PART 1. GENERALLY [32501. - 35312.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [32501. - 32516.5.]

32501.

This division shall be known as the Milk and Milk Products Act of 1947.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32501.5.

There is within the Department of Food and Agriculture the Milk and Dairy Food Safety Branch.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 726, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32503.

“Approved milk inspection service” means a milk inspection unit and laboratory which are maintained in connection with a county for the purpose of grading market milk and inspecting dairy farms which are producing market milk, or in connection with a county or city for the purpose of inspecting establishments as provided for in Section 33704, within an area which is designated and assigned by the director, conformable to this division and the regulations established by the director, which inspection service has been approved in writing by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32504.

“Cream” means that portion of milk, rich in milk fat, which rises to the surface of milk that is left standing or which is separated from milk by centrifugal force.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32505.

“Dairy farm” means any place or premises upon which milk is produced for sale or other distribution and where more than two cows or water buffalo, or six goats, sheep, or other hooved mammals, are in lactation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

32506.

“Dairy farm scorecard” means the card which is adopted by the director pursuant to Section 32791 for the official scoring of dairy farms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32508.

“Manufacturing cream” means cream which does not conform to the requirements of market cream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32509.

“Manufacturing milk” means milk which does not conform to the requirements of market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32510.

“Market milk” means milk which conforms to the standards which are provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35751), Part 2, of this division. Market milk includes components and derivatives of market milk. Market milk may be supplied to the consumer in the fluid state or may also be utilized in the manufacture of milk products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

32511.

“Milk” means the unadulterated lacteal secretion which is obtained from the udder of a cow, water buffalo, goat, sheep, or other hooved mammal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

32512.

“Milk product” or “dairy product” means any product which is prepared or manufactured from milk, for which product a standard of composition is established by this division, and any new milk product or combination milk and food product for which a temporary standard of composition is established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 36601) of Part 3. “Milk product” or “dairy product” does not include “products resembling milk products” as defined in Section 38912.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 613.)
-------------------------------------------

32513.

“Milk products plant” means any place in which a person engages in the business of handling, receiving, manufacturing, freezing, processing, or packaging milk, or any product of milk or engages in the business of manufacturing, freezing, or processing imitation ice cream or imitation ice milk. “Milk products plant” does not include a properly licensed retail food facility that does either of the following:

(a) Packages dairy products in the presence of the consumer.

(b) Cuts, wraps, and packages cheese, excluding cottage cheese, that is purchased from a licensed manufacturer of milk products, labels the products pursuant to all applicable
 state and federal laws, and sells the product only to consumers on the premises of the retail food facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 323, Sec. 3.   (AB 2682)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

32514.

“Milk products plant scorecard” means the card which is adopted by the director pursuant to Section 32791 for the official scoring of milk products plants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32515.

“Pasteurized” means that the milk or milk product has been subjected to a process which is described in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 34001) of this part, or other process which has been demonstrated to be equally efficient and has been approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32516.

“Product of milk” means milk product as set forth in Section 32512 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

32516.5.

“Restricted use market milk” means market milk that does not conform to the standards specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 35781), Article 13 (commencing with Section 36091), and Article 14 (commencing with Section 36123) of Chapter 2 of Part 2. Restricted use market milk includes components and derivatives of restricted use market milk. Restricted use market milk may only be utilized in manufactured milk products as defined in Part 3 (commencing with Section 36601) that do not require the use of market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers of Director [32701. - 32814.]



  ARTICLE 1. Enforcement [32701. - 32704.]

32701.

The director shall, and representatives of approved milk inspection services under his general supervision may, enforce this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32702.

The director may bring an action to enjoin any violation or threatened violation of any provision of this division, in the superior court in and for the county in which the violation occurred or is about to occur.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32703.

Any proceeding pursuant to this article shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32704.

Any money in the Department of Agriculture Fund which is derived under this division may be expended for the enforcement of any or all of the provisions of this division, notwithstanding any other provision of law, except Section 35252, which limits the expenditure of any such money to some specific purpose or to the enforcement of some specific section, article, or chapter of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inspection and Samples [32731. - 32734.]

32731.

The director may do all of the following:

(a) Enter and inspect any premises or conveyance where any provision of this division is applicable.

(b) Take a sample of any milk, cream, product of milk or cream, or product resembling milk products.

(c) Impound and hold for analysis or as evidence any milk, cream, product of milk or cream, or product resembling milk products.

(d) Impound and hold for analysis or as evidence any container of milk, cream, or product of milk or cream.

(e) Examine, inspect, test or by other means determine the health of any cow or goat.

(f) Exclude from the herd any animal which produces milk that is unfit for human consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

32732.

No prosecution which is based upon a sample of milk, cream, a product of milk or cream, or a product resembling milk products shall be had unless a duplicate of the sample is left with the accused.

Samples which are taken in connection with the establishment of proof of fraudulent manipulation of the tests for the basis of payment for milk or cream, need not, however, be given to the accused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

32733.

Samples of milk, milk products, and products resembling milk products to be tested for coliform bacteria shall be taken at the plant where packaged or from delivery vehicles owned or operated by the plant.

Sampling procedures and laboratory methods for the determination of coliform bacteria shall be established by regulations issued by the director to insure accuracy of the sampling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

32734.

(a) In addition to any other provision of law, the secretary shall require inspections at least quarterly of all milk products plants that pasteurize milk or milk products, manufacture cheese, or manufacture raw milk cheese. The inspection procedures shall include sanitation inspections and pasteurization equipment controls and tests, where applicable. The procedure shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Review of all pasteurization records required pursuant to Sections 34007, 34064, and 34065.

(2) Inspection and testing of all pasteurization equipment to ensure its cleanliness and proper operating condition.

(3) Inspection of all equipment, facilities, raw milk and milk products handling practices, and surroundings to ensure adequate sanitation.

(4) Sampling and testing of raw products and processed milk products.

(b) The findings of all inspections, sample results, controls, and tests shall be prepared in writing by the inspector and submitted to the secretary.

(c) Milk products plants that have been approved to use Hazard Analysis Critical Control Points (HACCP) procedures under the auspices of the National Conference of Interstate Milk Shipments, or a state or federal regulatory agency, may adhere to the inspection protocol of the HACCP regulatory enforcement procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Animals Carrying Pesticide Residues [32741. - 32743.]

32741.

If the director determines that any female dairy animal, including any goat, is carrying pesticide residues in its body or has been fed any feed which contains an amount of pesticide residues which will cause the milk produced from the animal to be adulterated with pesticide residues, he may order the animal to be held on the premises where it is found until he has determined that milk produced by the animal is not adulterated with pesticide residues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32742.

It is unlawful for any person to move any such animal except under written permission of the director and in accordance with the conditions stated in such written permission, or until the hold order has been revoked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32743.

The director shall notify the owner or agent of any animal which is ordered held, or for which he has specified conditions for moving, pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Condemnation [32761. - 32767.]

32761.

The director may condemn any of the following:

(a) Milk or cream which is found to be impure, tainted, unclean, adulterated, or unwholesome.

(b) Milk or cream that is produced, handled, or kept in an insanitary place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32761.5.

The director shall test milk and milk products for the presence of drug residues. The director may adopt, by regulation, official drug residue testing methods and procedures for industry testing of raw milk from all bulk raw milk pickup tankers, prior to processing, for the presence of beta-lactam drugs and for other drug residues, as determined by the director. The director shall adopt, by regulation, official drug residue testing methods used for the detection of drug residue in farm bulk milk tanks, bulk milk pickup tankers, and milk and milk products in processing plants, wholesale outlets, and retail outlets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

32762.

The director may mark any condemned milk or cream for identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32763.

The director shall prescribe the method of marking condemned milk or cream for identification but shall not, in marking condemned milk or cream, add any substance to it which shall render the condemned milk or cream unsuitable for a use or purpose except human consumption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32764.

Condemned milk or cream which has been marked for identification shall be returned to the producer of the milk or cream, if requested by the producer, or shall be used in the manufacture of products other than products which are used for human consumption, or shall be destroyed. Such condemned milk or cream which has been marked for identification shall not be destroyed until the producer of the milk or cream has been notified. Upon such notification the producer shall immediately request the milk or cream be returned to him at his expense or request that it be destroyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32765.

The director may condemn any product of milk or cream or product resembling a milk product which is within any of the following classes:

(a) Impure, unclean, unwholesome, or stale.

(b) Produced or manufactured, handled, or kept in an insanitary place.

(c) Adulterated or mislabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

32766.

The director may destroy or mark for identification with a nontoxic substance, any condemned product of milk or cream or product resembling a milk product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1250.)